Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5113
Valuation of investments.

For purposes of the Insurers Investment Act, investments shall be valued in accordance with the valuation procedures established by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners unless the director requires a different valuation method or finds another valuation method reasonable under the circumstances.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 13.